Utah statutes.
49-12-302.   Purchase of service credit.

Any member who works 20 or more hours per week for a participating employer participating in this system, but does not meet other eligibility requirements for service credit, may purchase the service credit in accordance with Section 49-11-403.



Enacted by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

